pt-PT: Aumento salarial para os licenciados: 0,5 mm; 1 mm; 1/16 in; 1/32 in; 1/4 in; 1/8 in; 2 mm; Outro
de: Skalenteilung: 0,5 mm; 1 mm; 1/16 Zoll; 1/32 Zoll; 1/4 Zoll; 1/8 Zoll; 2 mm; Andere
ru: Шаг делений шкалы: 0,5 мм; 1 мм; 1/16 дюйма; 1/32 дюйма; 1/4 дюйма; 1/8 дюйма; 2 мм; Другое
da: Gradueringsinterval: 0,5 mm; 1 mm; 1/16 tomme; 1/32 tomme; 1/4 tomme; 1/8 tomme; 2 mm; Andet
ja: 段階的上昇: 0.5 mm; 1 mm; 1/16インチ; 1/32インチ; 1/4インチ; 1/8インチ; 2 mm; その他
ro-RO: Incrementul de gradație: 0,5 mm; 1 mm; 1/16 in; 1/32 in; 1/4 in; 1/8 in; 2 mm; Altele
pl: Podziałka: 0,5 mm; 1 mm; 1/16 cala; 1/32 cala; 1/4 cala; 1/8 cala; 2 mm; Inny
zh-TW: 刻度增量: 0.5 公釐; 1 公釐; 1/16 吋; 1/32 吋; 1/4 吋; 1/8 吋; 2 公釐; 其他
en: Graduation increment: 0.5 mm; 1 mm; 1/16 in; 1/32 in; 1/4 in; 1/8 in; 2 mm; Other
nb: Gradueringsøkning: 0,5 mm; 1 mm; 1/16 tommer; 1/32 tommer; 1/4 tommer; 1/8 tommer; 2 mm; Annet
bg-BG: Стъпка на делението: 0,5 mm; 1 mm; 1/16 in; 1/32 in; 1/4 in; 1/8 in; 2 mm; Друго
ko: 눈금 단위: 0.5 mm; 1 mm; 1/16 in; 1/32 in; 1/4 in; 1/8 in; 2 mm; 기타
pt-BR: Incremento de graduação: 0,5 mm; 1 mm; 1/16 pol; 1/32 pol; 1/4 pol; 1/8 pol; 2 mm; Outro
sv: Gradindelning: 0,5 mm; 1 mm; 1/16 tum; 1/32 tum; 1/4 tum; 1/8 tum; 2 mm; Annan
cs: Přírůstek dílků stupnice: 0,5 mm; 1 mm; 1/16 in; 1/32 in; 1/4 in; 1/8 in; 2 mm; Ostatní
nl: Schaalverdeling stapgrootte: 0,5 mm; 1 mm; 1/16 inch; 1/32 inch; 1/4 inch; 1/8 inch; 2 mm; Anders
th: ขีดบอกระยะ: 0.5 มม.; 1 มม.; 1/16 นิ้ว; 1/32 นิ้ว; 1/4 นิ้ว; 1/8 นิ้ว; 2 มม.; อื่นๆ
fi: Kokojen porrastus: 0,5 mm; 1 mm; 1/16 tuumaa; 1/32 tuumaa; 1/4 tuumaa; 1/8 tuumaa; 2 mm; Muu
it: Incremento di laurea: 0,5 mm; 1 mm; 1/16 in; 1/32 in; 1/4 in; 1/8 in; 2 mm; Altro
vi: Bước chia độ: 0,5 mm; 1 mm; 1/16 in; 1/32 in; 1/4 in; 1/8 in; 2 mm; Khác
zh-CN: 刻度增量: 0.5 mm; 1 mm; 1/16 in; 1/32 in; 1/4 in; 1/8 in; 2 mm; 其他
sl-SI: Korak merilne lestvice: 0,5 mm; 1 mm; 1/16 in; 1/32 in; 1/4 in; 1/8 in; 2 mm; Drugo
hu: Skálaosztás: 0,5 mm; 1 mm; 1/16 in; 1/32 in; 1/4 in; 1/8 in; 2 mm; Egyéb
lt-LT: Skalės padalos žingsnis: 0,5 mm; 1 mm; 1/16 col.; 1/32 col.; 1/4 col.; 1/8 col.; 2 mm; Kita
es: Incremento de graduación: 0,5 mm; 1 mm; 1/16 in; 1/32 in; 1/4 in; 1/8 in; 2 mm; Otro
el: Διαβάθμιση κλίμακας (Graduation increment): 0,5 mm; 1 mm; 1/16 in; 1/32 in; 1/4 in; 1/8 in; 2 mm; Άλλο
tr: Ölçü aralığı: 0,5 mm; 1 mm; 1/16 inç; 1/32 inç; 1/4 inç; 1/8 inç; 2 mm; Diğer
hr-HR: Povećanje diplome: 0,5 mm; 1 mm; 1/16 in; 1/32 in; 1/4 in; 1/8 in; 2 mm; Ostalo
fr: Intervalle de graduation: 0,5 mm; 1 mm; 1/16 po; 1/32 po; 1/4 po; 1/8 po; 2 mm; Autre
sk-SK: Dielik stupnice: 0,5 mm; 1 mm; 1/16 palca; 1/32 palca; 1/4 palca; 1/8 palca; 2 mm; Iné